Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Legislature encourages the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education to exercise all powers necessary or convenient to
accomplish the purposes of Article XIII-A of the Oklahoma
Constitution and recommends that the State Regents allow up to one
change of function for each institution within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education. Exceptions to functions and associated
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

degr ee programs may also be considered for unique and specific
purposes, such as addressing unmet workforce needs that cannot be
met through existing programs or collaboration. All such requests
shall be approved by the institution’s governing board and meet the
criteria outlined in the State Regents’ policies and procedures.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3213.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3213.1. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make educational program resources at institutions
in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education available to the
people in the Ponca City area. This program shall be known as the
University Center at Ponca City.
B. The State Regents shall draw upon the educational programs
of institutions best suited to provide the kind of educational
programs needed and shall, in pursuance of Article XIII-A of the
Oklahoma Constitution of Oklahoma and appropriate statutes, set the
standards of education as they relate to the programs operated to
assure that credits earned by students will be fully accepted at
institutions of higher education to which the students may transfer
the credit to apply toward an educational study objective. Northern
Oklahoma College shall have exclusive authority to offer all lower
division courses and programs at the University Center at Ponca City
as listed in the current college catalog of Northern Oklahoma
College. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, Northern
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Okla homa College may offer, but shall not have exclusive authority
to offer, lower division courses and programs at the University
Center at Ponca City.
C. The State Regents may establish appropriate funds and
accounts, including a revolving fund, in the Office of State Finance
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for servicing the
fiscal operations of the University Center at Ponca City. The funds
and accounts shall be subject to the direct supervision, management,
and control of the board of trustees created by subsection D of this
section. The people locally shall provide suitable physical plant
accommodations for the University Center at Ponca City.
D. There is hereby created a board of nine (9) trustees to be
appointed by the Governor by and with the consent of the Senate to
serve as the administrative agency for the University Center at
Ponca City. The board shall be a body corporate and shall adopt and
use an official seal. The board so created shall have the authority
to submit a budget annually to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, administer monies budgeted by the State Regents, provide
educational facilities, recommend courses and programs to be offered
by participating institutions, select a chief executive officer
whose duties include the general coordination of approved programs
and services, and the selection of other appropriate nonteaching
personnel. The board of trustees is authorized to expend all monies
allocated to the University Center at Ponca City as may be necessary
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

to p erform the duties and responsibilities imposed upon the board by
this section. For purposes of acquiring and taking title to real
and personal property from sources other than state appropriations,
the board is authorized to enter into contracts and to adopt rules
and regulations pertaining to such actions. The initial nine (9)
members shall serve their terms for the period to which originally
appointed, in numbered positions having dates of expiration
identical to the dates of expiration of the original appointments:
Position No. 1. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2013, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 2. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2014, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 3. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2015, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 4. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2016, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 5. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2017, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 6. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2018, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 7. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2019, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 8. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2020, and each nine (9) years thereafter; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Position No. 9. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2021, and each nine (9) years thereafter.
The board shall organize and elect a chair, vice-chair vice
chair, and secretary annually.
E. The board of trustees may establish and maintain plans for
tenure and retirement of its employees and for payment of deferred
compensation of employees and may provide hospital and medical
benefits, accident, health and life insurance, and annuity contracts
for employees and pay for all or part of the cost with funds
available for payment of its operating expenses.
F. The board may establish with the State Treasurer any
accounts as are necessary to operate retirement, deferred
compensation, or benefits plans for its employees. The accounts
shall be revolving funds not subject to fiscal year limitations.
Funds deposited in the accounts may be invested in any of the types
of instruments in which the State Treasurer is authorized by law to
invest.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3405.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3405.1. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make resident college credit courses and programs
available to the people of Muskogee.
B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
provide lower division classes and programs through a branch of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Conn ors State College, which shall be established and located in
Muskogee. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the State
Regents may provide lower and upper division classes and programs
through a branch of Connors State College, which shall be
established and located in Muskogee. The branch campus of Connors
State College shall be governed by the Board of Regents for the
Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical Colleges and administered
through Connors State College.
C. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
provide upper division classes and programs and graduate classes at
the Masters level through a branch of Northeastern State University,
which shall be established and located at Muskogee. Beginning with
the 2026-2027 academic year, the State Regents may provide lower and
upper division classes and programs and graduate classes at the
Masters level through a branch of Northeastern State University,
which shall be located at Muskogee. The branch campus of
Northeastern State University shall be governed by the Board of
Regents of Oklahoma Colleges and administered through Northeastern
State University.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4662, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4662. On January 1, 1999, there shall be established as
a successor to Rogers University in Tulsa a branch institution of
Oklahoma State University which shall be known as Oklahoma State
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Univ ersity/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-Tulsa and shall offer
upper division undergraduate courses and baccalaureate degree
programs. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, Oklahoma
State University-Tulsa may offer lower and upper division
undergraduate courses and baccalaureate degree programs. No later
than July 1, 2001, the Board of Regents for the Oklahoma
Agricultural and Mechanical Colleges, in cooperation with the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, shall have developed
and implemented programs leading to baccalaureate degrees that can
be earned at Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma State
University-Tulsa. Beginning with the 2001 – 2002 2001-2002 academic
year, degrees earned at Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma
State University-Tulsa shall be designated as awarded by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education acting through Oklahoma
State University; provided, that dual degree programs may be offered
at Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-Tulsa
and dual degrees may be awarded through Oklahoma State University
and other institutions.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4665, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4665. Courses A. Except as provided for in subsection
B of this section, courses offered at the undergraduate level
through Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-
Tulsa shall not duplicate those offered by Tulsa Community College.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, courses offered
at the undergraduate level through Oklahoma State University-Tulsa
may duplicate those offered by Tulsa Community College, as
determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4667, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4667. On July 1, 2001, there shall be established a
branch of Langston University within the Tulsa metropolitan area
consistent with the statewide plan for Langston University as
provided in Section 6 of this act Section 4666 of this title.
Langston University shall continue to meet the missions and programs
of the Langston Urban Center in Tulsa. The Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education are authorized to make upper division
undergraduate and graduate course offerings at the Langston
University Branch branch in Tulsa available as the State Regents
shall determine are appropriate. Beginning with the 2026-2027
academic year, the State Regents are authorized to make lower and
upper division undergraduate and graduate course offerings at the
Langston University branch in Tulsa available as the State Regents
shall determine are appropriate. Undergraduate degree programs
offered through Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma State
University-Tulsa shall not duplicate those undergraduate degree
programs offered by the Langston University Branch branch in Tulsa,
as determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and shall be consistent with and in furthering implementation of the
statewide plan for Langston University as developed by the State
Regents pursuant to Section 6 of this act Section 4666 of this title
and filed with the Office for Civil Rights, United States Department
of Education. Provided, however, that beginning with the 2026-2027
academic year, undergraduate degree programs offered through
Oklahoma State University-Tulsa may duplicate those undergraduate
degree programs offered by the Langston University branch in Tulsa,
as determined by the State Regents.
The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall fund
Langston University at a level not less than its fiscal year 1998
level, and its Education and General Budget shall be held harmless
from reductions in succeeding years. The Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education shall allocate funds to Langston University
sufficient to fund full time full-time faculty in Tulsa at a level
equal to seventy percent (70%) of its faculty level that existed in
Tulsa in fiscal year 1998 and adequate building and classroom space
which were funded in fiscal year 1998 in order to carry out all
functions in Tulsa. The Board of Regents for the Oklahoma
Agricultural and Mechanical Colleges shall allocate space for
Langston University in Tulsa.
It is the intent of the Legislature that Langston University be
funded at a level consistent with the average allocation and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

allo tment of the institutions in the regional funding tier as
established by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
Beginning with the 2001 – 2002 2001-2002 academic year, degrees
earned at the Langston University Branch branch in Tulsa shall be
designated as awarded by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education acting through Langston University.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4668, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4668. On July 1, 2001, there may be established a
branch of Northeastern State University within the Tulsa
metropolitan area. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
are authorized to make upper division undergraduate and graduate
course offerings at the Northeastern State University branch in
Broken Arrow available as the State Regents shall determine are
appropriate. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the State
Regents are authorized to make lower and upper division
undergraduate and graduate course offerings at the Northeastern
State University branch in Broken Arrow available as the State
Regents shall determine are appropriate. Undergraduate degree
programs offered through Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma
State University-Tulsa shall not duplicate those undergraduate
degree programs offered by Northeastern State University in Tulsa,
as determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
Provided, however, that beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

unde rgraduate degree programs offered through Oklahoma State
University-Tulsa may duplicate those undergraduate degree programs
offered by Northeastern State University in Tulsa, as determined by
the State Regents.
The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall fund
Northeastern State University at a level not less than its fiscal
year 1998 level, and its Education and General Budget shall be held
harmless from reductions in succeeding years.
It is the intent of the Legislature that Northeastern State
University in Broken Arrow be funded at a level consistent with the
average allocation and allotment of the institutions in the regional
funding tier as established by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
Beginning with the 2001 – 2002 2001-2002 academic year, degrees
earned at the Northeastern State University Branch branch in Tulsa
Broken Arrow shall be designated as awarded by the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education acting through Northeastern State
University.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
April 22, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2854 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)